Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.031, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin County authority to limit firearms for deer hunting. new text end new text begin A county board may adopt an ordinance after notice and public hearing to limit the type of firearms that may be used to hunt deer within the county. An ordinance passed under this subdivision is effective for no more than one year. Subsequent ordinances may be adopted under this subdivision only after additional notice and public hearing and are effective for no more than one year. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.318, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01694 97B.318 ARMS USE AREAS AND RESTRICTIONS; REGULAR FIREARMS SEASON. Subdivision 1. Shotgun use area. During the regular firearms season in the shotgun use area, only legal shotguns loaded with single-slug shotgun shells, legal muzzle-loading long guns, and legal handguns may be used for taking deer. Legal shotguns include those with rifled barrels. The shotgun use area is that portion of the state lying within the following described boundary: Beginning on the west boundary of the state at the northern boundary of Clay County; thence along the northern boundary of Clay County to State Trunk Highway (STH) 32; thence along STH 32 to STH 34; thence along STH 34 to Interstate Highway 94 (I-94); thence along I-94 to County State-Aid Highway (CSAH) 40, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 40 to CSAH 82, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 82 to CSAH 22, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 22 to CSAH 6, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 6 to CSAH 14, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 14 to STH 29; thence along STH 29 to CSAH 46, Otter Tail County; thence along CSAH 46, Otter Tail County, to CSAH 22, Todd County; thence along CSAH 22 to U.S. Highway 71; thence along U.S. Highway 71 to STH 27; thence along STH 27 to the Mississippi River; thence along the east bank of the Mississippi River to STH 23; thence along STH 23 to STH 95; thence along STH 95 to U.S. Highway 8; thence along U.S. Highway 8 to the eastern boundary of the state; thence along the east, south, and west boundaries of the state to the point of beginning. Subd. 2. All legal firearms use area. The all legal firearms use area is that part of the state lying outside of the shotgun use area.